Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 1. In General
§ 33-21-134.
Registered professional nurse; use of R.N.; advanced practice registered nurse; use of A.P.R.N.

Any person who holds a license to practice as a registered professional nurse in this state or who holds a license in another state and is practicing in this state pursuant to the Nurse Licensure Compact, shall have the right to use the title “Registered Nurse” and the abbreviation “R.N.” No other person shall assume this title or use this abbreviation or any words, letters, signs or devices to indicate that the person using same is a registered professional nurse.

Any person who holds a license to practice as an advanced practice registered nurse in this state, or who holds a license in another state and is practicing in this state pursuant to the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Compact, shall have the right to use the title “Advanced Practice Registered Nurse” and the abbreviation “A.P.R.N.” No other person shall assume this title or use this abbreviation or any words, letters, signs or devices to indicate that the person using same is an advance practice registered nurse.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 2005, ch. 224, § 1; 2016 ch. 10, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2016 ch. 11, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added (b), designating the existing provisions as (a).

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by ch. 10 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, added “or who holds a license in another state and is practicing in this state pursuant to the Nurse Licensure Compact,” following “registered professional nurse in this state” in (a).

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 11 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, added “or who holds a license in another state and is practicing in this state pursuant to the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Compact” in the first sentence of (b).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

§ 33-21-135.
Licensed practical nurse; use of L.P.N.

Any person who holds a license to practice as a licensed practical nurse in this state or who holds a license in another state and is practicing in this state pursuant to the Nurse Licensure Compact, shall have the right to use the title “Licensed Practical Nurse” and the abbreviation “L.P.N.” No other person shall assume this title or use this abbreviation or any words, letters, signs or devices to indicate that the person using same is a licensed practical nurse.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 2005, ch. 224, § 1; 2016 ch. 10, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted “in this state” in the first sentence.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, added “or who holds a license in another state and is practicing in this state pursuant to the Nurse Licensure Compact,” following “licensed practical nurse in this state” in the first sentence.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 306, effective July 1, 2004, appropriates $1,500,000 from the general fund to the state auditor to be expended to bring salaries for licensed practical nurse (LPN), Nurse 3, Nurse 4 and Nurse 5 positions to a competitive level of Wyoming nursing salaries as determined by the human resources division of the department of administration and information. This appropriation is to be utilized to achieve maximum recruitment and retention, and to reduce turnover and the need to utilize pool nurses. Of this general fund appropriation, funds are not to be used to supplant other funding sources if such sources have been used to fund nursing positions prior to the effective date of this act.

§ 33-21-136.
New graduate professional nurse; use of G.N.; new graduate advanced practice registered nurse; use of G.A.P.R.N.

Any person who holds a temporary permit as a new graduate professional nurse in this state shall use the title “Graduate Nurse” and the abbreviation “G.N.” No other person shall assume this title or use this abbreviation or any words, letters, signs or devices to indicate that the person using same is a new graduate professional nurse.

Any person who holds a temporary permit as a new graduate advanced practice registered nurse in this state shall use the title “Graduate Advanced Practice Registered Nurse” and the abbreviation “G.A.P.R.N.” No other person shall assume this title or use this abbreviation or any words, letters, signs or devices to indicate that the person using same is a new graduate advanced practice registered nurse.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 2005, ch. 224, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added (b), designating the existing provisions as (a); and in (a), in the first sentence, inserted “in this state.”

§ 33-21-137.
New graduate practical nurse; use of G.P.N.

Any person who holds a temporary permit as a new graduate practical nurse in this state shall use the title “Graduate Practical Nurse” and the abbreviation “G.P.N.” No other person shall assume this title or use this abbreviation or any words, letters, signs or devices to indicate that the person using same is a new graduate practical nurse.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 2005, ch. 224, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted “in this state” in the first sentence and made a stylistic change.

§ 33-21-138.
Nursing education programs; approval by board.

The board shall by rules and regulations that establish standards for nursing education programs define the process for board approval of nursing education programs and collect actual costs incurred for the approval process for nursing education programs, not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000.00).

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 2005, ch. 224, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section, which formerly read: “The board shall by rules and regulations establish standards for nursing education programs as meet the requirements of this act and the board rules and regulations.”

Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 2, subsection 057, appropriates $250,000 to be used to fund licensed practical nursing outreach program coordinators, which funding is not to be released to a college until the college has signed an agreement with a community outside the college district to offer a licensed practical nursing program in the community.

Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 400, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2005.

§ 33-21-139.
Nursing education programs; approval by board; procedure.

An institution or program desiring to initiate a nursing education program in this state shall apply to the board and submit evidence that its nursing program is able to meet the standards established by the board. If upon investigation the board finds that the program meets the established standards for nursing education programs, it may grant approval to the applicant program.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 2005, ch. 224, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “or program” for “within the state” and inserted “in this state.”

§ 33-21-140.
Nursing education programs; periodic evaluation.

The board shall periodically provide for reevaluation of approved nursing education programs based on actual reports or resurveys and shall publish a list of approved programs. The board shall collect actual costs incurred for the survey and approval process from the nursing education program, not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000.00).

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 2005, ch. 224, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added the second sentence.

§ 33-21-141.
Nursing education programs; denial or withdrawal of approval.

The board may deny or withdraw approval or take action as deemed necessary regarding nursing education programs that fail to meet the standards established by the board, provided that all actions shall be effected in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

].

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1.

§ 33-21-142.
Nursing education programs; reinstatement of approval.

The board may reinstate approval of a nursing education program upon submission of satisfactory evidence that its program meets the standards established by the board.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1.

§ 33-21-143.
Nursing education programs; provisional approval.

The board may grant provisional approval of new programs pending the licensure results of the first graduating class.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1.

§ 33-21-144.
Nursing education programs; conditional approval.

The board may grant conditional approval of an established program pending removal or correction of deficiencies, as identified by the board.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1.

§ 33-21-145.
Violations; penalties.

No person shall:

Engage in the practice of nursing or nurse assisting as defined in this act without a valid, current license, certificate or temporary permit, except as otherwise permitted under this act or the Nurse Licensure Compact or the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Compact;

Practice nursing or nurse assisting under cover of any diploma, license, certificate or record illegally or fraudulently obtained or signed or issued unlawfully or under fraudulent representation;

Use any words, abbreviations, figures, letters, titles, signs, cards or devices tending to imply that the person is an advanced practice registered nurse, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse or certified nursing assistant unless the person is duly licensed or certified as an advanced practice registered nurse, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse or certified nursing assistant under this act or the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Compact or holds a license in another state and is practicing in this state pursuant to the Nurse Licensure Compact;

Knowingly employ unlicensed or uncertified persons in the practice of nursing or nurse assisting;

Knowingly conceal information relating to violations of this act;

Conduct a nursing education program for the preparation of registered nurses or licensed practical nurses unless the program has been approved by the board;

Otherwise violate or aid or abet another person to violate any provision of this act; or

Practice nursing or nurse assisting during the time a license or certificate is suspended, revoked, surrendered, inactive or lapsed.

Violation of any of the provisions of this act constitutes a misdemeanor and upon conviction, the person is subject to a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2005, ch. 224, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2016 ch. 10, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2016 ch. 11, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b), inserted “any of” following “Violation of.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote (a)(iii); added (a)(viii); and made stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendment,

deleted “or” at the end of (a)(vi).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by ch. 10 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, in (a)(i), added “or the Nurse Licensure Compact” at the end; in (a)(ii), added “or holds a license in another state and is practicing in this state pursuant to the Nurse Licensure Compact” at the end.

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 10 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, added “or the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Compact” at the end of (a)(i) and (a)(iii).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, added “or nurse assisting” following “practice of nursing” and variants throughout the section; in (a)(ii) added “certificate” preceding “or record illegally”; in (a)(iii) added “an advanced practice registered nurse” following “the person is,” substituted “certified nursing assistant” for “advanced practice registered nurse” preceding “unless the person,” substituted “duly licensed or certified as an advanced practice registered nurse, registered nurse” for “duly licensed as a registered nurse,” and substituted “or certified nursing assistant” for “or recognized as an advanced practice registered nurse”; in (a)(iv) added “or uncertified” following “unlicensed” and added “or nurse assisting” following “practice of nursing”;
in (a)(viii) added “or nurse assisting” following “practice nursing” and “or certificate” following “a license.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-21-120(a)(xiii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 33-21-146.
Disciplining licensees and certificate holders; grounds.

The board of nursing may refuse to issue or renew, or may suspend or revoke the license, certificate or temporary permit of any person, or to otherwise discipline a licensee or certificate holder, upon proof that the person:

Has engaged in any act inconsistent with uniform and reasonable standards of nursing practice as defined by board rules and regulations;

Has been found guilty by a court, has entered an Alford plea or has entered a plea of nolo contendere to a misdemeanor or felony that relates adversely to the practice of nursing or to the ability to practice nursing;

Has practiced fraud or deceit:

In procuring or attempting to procure a license or certificate to practice nursing or nurse assisting;

In filing or reporting any health care information, including but not limited to client documentation, agency records or other essential health documents;

In signing any report or record as an advanced practice registered nurse, registered nurse, a licensed practical nurse or certified nursing assistant;

In representing authority to practice nursing or nurse assisting; or

In submitting any information or record to the board.

Is unfit or incompetent to practice nursing by reason of negligence, habits or other causes including but not limited to:

Being unable to practice nursing with reasonable skill and safety to patients by reason of physical or mental disability, or use of drugs, narcotics, chemicals or any other mind-altering material; or

Performance of unsafe nursing practice or failure to conform to the essential standards of acceptable and prevailing nursing practice, in which case actual injury need not be established.

Has engaged in any unauthorized possession or unauthorized use of a controlled substance as defined in the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act [§§

35-7-1001

through

35-7-1057

];

Has had a license or certificate to practice nursing or nurse assisting or to practice in another health care discipline in another jurisdiction, territory or possession of the United States denied, revoked, suspended or otherwise restricted;

Has practiced nursing or nurse assisting within this state without a valid current license or temporary permit or as otherwise permitted under this act, the Nurse Licensure Compact or the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Compact;

Has knowingly and willfully failed to report to the board any violation of this act or of board rules and regulations;

Has been found by the board to have violated any of the provisions of this act or of board rules and regulations;

Has knowingly engaged in an act which the licensee or certificate holder knew was beyond the scope of the individual’s nursing or nurse assisting practice prior to committing the act, or performed acts without sufficient education, knowledge or ability to apply nursing principles and skills;

Has failed to submit to a mental, physical or medical competency examination following a proper request by the board made pursuant to board rules and regulations and the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act; or

Has violated a previously entered board order.

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license or certificate issued by the board, the board shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the license or certificate in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a license or certificate withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 1993, ch. 8, § 1; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2005, ch. 224, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2011, ch. 171, § 1; 2016 ch. 10, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(ii) inserted “has entered an Alford plea” and “misdemeanor or”; rewrote (a)(iii)(B), which formerly read: “In filing any reports or completing patient records”; in (a)(vi) deleted provisions pertaining to continuing education; added (a)(xi); and made stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendment,

deleted “or” at the end of (a)(ix).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in the introductory language of (a), inserted “or certificate holder”; added (a)(xii); and made related changes.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, added “or the Nurse Licensure Compact” at the end in in (a)(vii).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “license or certificate” for “license” throughout the section; substituted “practice nursing or nurse assisting” for “practice nursing” throughout the section; rewrote (a)(iii)(C), which formerly read: “In signing any report or record as a registered nurse or as a licensed practical nurse”; in (a)(vii) added “or the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Compact” to the end; in (a)(x) added “or certificate holder” following “which the licensee”; and made related changes.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-21-120(a)(xiii).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Conflicting Legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 33-21-147.
Disciplining licensees or certificate holders; procedure.

A proceeding for discipline of a licensee, certificate holder or a temporary permit holder, or action against an applicant for a license, certificate or temporary permit, may be commenced when the board has reasonable grounds to believe that a person under the board’s jurisdiction has committed acts in violation of W.S.

33-21-146

. No license or certificate to practice nursing or nurse assisting may be revoked or denied by the board without affording the licensee, certificate holder or applicant due process of law. However, the board may summarily suspend a license or certificate and institute proceedings concomitantly if the board finds that the licensee or certificate holder presents a clear and immediate danger to the public health, safety and welfare if allowed to continue to practice. For purposes of a suspension or other restriction imposed pursuant to W.S.

33-21-146

(b), the board may presume that the court imposing the suspension or restriction afforded the licensee, certificate holder or applicant due process of law.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2017 ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, added “certificate holder” following “licensee” and
variants numerous times, added “certificate” following “license” and variants twice,
added “or nurse assisting” following “practice nursing” near the beginning of the second sentence, and made related changes.

§ 33-21-148.
Disciplining licensees; reinstatement.

Any person whose license or certificate has been denied, suspended or revoked, pursuant to this act, may apply to the board for reinstatement of the license or certificate or issuance of a license or certificate after fulfilling those requirements determined by the board. The application shall be made in writing and in the form prescribed by the board. The board may grant or deny the application or it may modify its original findings to reflect any circumstances that have changed sufficiently to warrant modifications.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 2017 ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Amendment Notes

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “license or certificate” for “license” three times.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of this act, referred to in this section, see § 33-21-120(a)(xiii).

§ 33-21-149.
Disciplining licensees or certificate holders; conditional licensure.

As a result of disciplinary action, the board may in addition to other powers and duties, issue, renew or reinstate licenses or certificates subject to reasonable conditions which the board may impose.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 2017 ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “license or certificate” for “license.”

§ 33-21-150.
Immunity of board members and persons reporting information to board.

Any member or agent of the board, or any person under oath, is not subject to a civil action for damages as a result of reporting information in good faith, without fraud or malice, relating to alleged violations of this act or board rules and regulations including, but not limited to:

Negligence, malpractice or the qualification, fitness or character of a person licensed or certified, or applying for a license or certificate, to practice nursing or nurse assisting; or

Violations of the standards of nursing education programs as defined by board rule and regulations.

The immunity provided by this section shall extend to the members of any professional review committee and witnesses appearing before the committee which is authorized by the board to act pursuant to this section.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 2005, ch. 224, § 1; 2017 ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote (a).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(i) substituted “license or certificate” for “license” twice and added “or nurse assisting” following “practice nursing”.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-21-120(a)(xiii).

§ 33-21-151.
Injunctive relief; grounds.

The board may petition in its own name for an injunction to a proper court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin:

Any person from practicing nursing or nurse assisting, within the meaning of this act, without a valid license, certificate or temporary permit, unless so exempted under W.S.

33-21-154

;

Any licensee or certificate holder from practicing who allegedly is in violation of this act; or

Any person, firm, corporation, institution or association from employing any individual to practice nursing or nurse assisting who is not licensed or certified under this act or exempted under W.S.

33-21-154

.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 2017 ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “practicing nursing or nurse assisting” for “practicing nursing” twice; in (a)(i) added “certificate” following “valid license,” in (a)(ii) added “ or certificate holder” following “any licensee,” in (a)(iii) added “or certified” following “not licensed.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of this act, referred to in this section, see § 33-21-120(a)(xiii).

§ 33-21-152.
Injunctive relief; procedure.

Upon the filing of a verified petition the court may issue an injunction for violation of W.S.

33-21-151

. In case of violation of an injunction issued under this section, the court may find the offender guilty of contempt of court.

The injunction proceedings shall be in addition to, not in lieu of, all penalties and other remedies provided in this act.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-21-120(a)(xiii).

§ 33-21-153.
Names of terminated licensees or certificate holders to board; enforcement by court order; civil contempt for noncompliance; immunity.

Hospitals, nursing homes and other employers of advanced practice registered nurses, registered nurses, licensed practical nurses and certified nursing assistants shall report to the board the names of those licensees or certificate holders whose employment has been terminated voluntarily or involuntarily for any reasons stipulated in W.S.

33-21-146

.

The board may seek an order from a proper court of competent jurisdiction for a report from any of the parties stipulated in subsection (a) of this section if one is not forthcoming voluntarily.

The board may seek a citation for civil contempt if a court order for a report is not obeyed by any of the parties stipulated in subsection (a) of this section.

Any institution or person reporting in good faith and without fraud or malice, information to the board under this section, is immune from civil action as provided in W.S.

33-21-150

.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 2005, ch. 224, § 1; 2017 ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), inserted “advanced practice registered nurses.”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, added “advanced practice registered nurses” following “other employers of,” substituted “certified nursing assistants” for “advanced practice registered nurses,” and substituted “licensees or certificate holders” for “licensees”.

§ 33-21-154.
Exemptions.

No provisions in this act prohibit:

The practice of nursing by persons enrolled in board approved nursing programs when the practice is part of their program of study;

The rendering of assistance by anyone in the case of an emergency;

The incidental health care by members of the family and friends;

The rendering of nursing services on a fee-for-service basis, or the reimbursement for nursing services directly to a registered nurse, licensed practical nurse or advanced practice registered nurse by any governmental program, commercial insurance company, hospital or medical services plan, or any other third-party payor;

The establishment of an independent nursing practice by one (1) or more licensed nurses for the purpose of rendering nursing services within the scope of the license to practice nursing;

The practice of any currently registered nurse, licensed practical nurse or advanced practice registered nurse of another state who is employed by the United States government, or any bureau, division or agency thereof while in the discharge of official duties;

The practice of any currently registered nurse, licensed practical nurse or advanced practice registered nurse of another state who is employed by an individual, agency or corporation located in another state and whose employment responsibilities include transporting patients into, out of, or through this state. The exemptions shall be limited to a period not to exceed forty-eight (48) hours for each transport;

The practice of any currently registered nurse, licensed practical nurse or advanced practice registered nurse of another state who is presenting educational programs or consultative services within this state for a period not to exceed a total of fourteen (14) days per year;

The practice of any nurse or nursing assistant, currently licensed or certified in another jurisdiction, in the provision of nursing care in the case of an emergency or disaster as declared by the governor;

The practice of any nurse within this state who holds a license in another state and is practicing in this state pursuant to the Nurse Licensure Compact;

The practice of any advanced practice registered nurse who holds a license in another state and is practicing in this state pursuant to the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Compact.

Nothing in this act shall be construed as:

Restricting the practice, services or activities of any person licensed under this title while practicing within the scope of practice provided in the person’s licensure act under this title; or

Prohibiting or regulating the delegation of functions within the scope of practice by any person other than a nurse licensed pursuant to this title provided that the delegation does not violate the act under which the person is licensed and provided that the board of nursing may discipline anyone licensed pursuant to this act for accepting any delegation that is beyond the person’s scope of practice as defined by this act and that presents a danger of harm to a patient.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 2005, ch. 224, § 1; 2011, ch. 169, § 1; 2016 ch. 10, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2016 ch. 11, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted “or advanced practice registered nurse” in (a)(iv), (a)(vi), (a)(vii) and (a)(viii); added (a)(ix); and added (b).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, rewrote (a)(i), which formerly read: “The practice of professional and practical nursing that is an integral part of a program by students enrolled in board approved nursing education programs leading to initial licensure.”

The 2016 amendments. —

The first
2016 amendment, by ch. 10 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, added (a)(x).

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 11 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, added (a)(x).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(ix) added “or nursing assistant” following “any nurse” and substituted “licensed or certified” for “licensed,” in (a)(xi) added “the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Compact” to the end.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of this act, referred to in this section, see § 33-21-120(a)(xiii).

§ 33-21-155.
Board to establish fees; disposition of fees; appropriations to board.

The board may establish appropriate fees as stated in board rules and regulations not to exceed the maximum stated in W.S. 33-21-122(c)(xxi).

All fees collected by the board under this act shall be deposited to the state treasurer’s office and shall be placed in a separate account. There shall be appropriated to the board of nursing from the account, sums as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this act. Appropriations shall be based upon submission of a budgetary request as provided by W.S.

9-2-1011

and

9-2-1012

.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 2005, ch. 224 § 1, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 224, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, in (a), substituted “W.S. 33-21-122(c)(xxi)” for “W.S. 33-21-122(c)(xx).”

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 231, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, in (b), substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the earmarked revenue fund” and “account” for “Wyoming state board of nursing earmarked revenue nurses' fund.”

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out incorporating amendments by both 2005 acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of this act, referred to in this section, see § 33-21-120(a)(xiii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 33-21-156.
Persons licensed under previous law.

Any individual holding a license to practice nursing as a registered nurse in this state that is valid on July 1, 2005, shall be deemed to be licensed as a registered nurse under this act.

Any individual holding a license to practice nursing as a licensed practical nurse in this state that is valid on July 1, 2005, shall be deemed to be licensed as a licensed practical nurse under this act.

Any individual eligible for reactivation of a license to practice nursing as a registered nurse or as a licensed practical nurse in this state on July 1, 2005, shall be deemed to be eligible to be licensed as a registered nurse or as a licensed practical nurse.

Any individual as of July 1, 2005, who has allowed a license to practice nursing as a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse in this state to lapse because of failure to renew, may become licensed as a registered nurse or as a licensed practical nurse by applying for relicensure pursuant to relicensure requirements established in this act and in board rules and regulations.

Those licensed under the provisions of subsections (a) through (d) of this section are eligible for renewal of the license pursuant to renewal requirements established in this act and in board rules and regulations.

Any individual holding recognition to practice as an advanced practice registered nurse in this state that is valid on July 1, 2005 shall be deemed to be an advanced practice registered nurse under this act.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 82, § 1; 1986, ch. 34, § 1; 2005, ch. 224, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote (f); and substituted “July 1, 2005” for “July 1, 1983” throughout the section.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-21-120(a)(xiii).

§ 33-21-157.
Nurses volunteer license.

As used in this section, “low income uninsured person” and “nonprofit health care facility” have the same meanings as in W.S. 33-15-131(a).

For purposes of this section, a person shall be considered retired from the practice of practical, professional or advanced practice registered nursing if the person’s license has expired.

The state board of nursing may issue, with or without examination, a volunteer’s license to a person who is retired from practice so that the person may provide nursing services to low income uninsured persons at nonprofit health care facilities. The board shall deny issuance of a volunteer’s license to a person who is not qualified under this section to hold a volunteer’s license.

An application for a volunteer’s license shall include all of the following:

A copy of the applicant’s nursing degree;

A copy of the applicant’s most recent license authorizing the practice of nursing issued by a jurisdiction in the United States that licenses persons to practice nursing;

Evidence of one (1) of the following, as applicable:

The applicant has maintained for at least ten (10) years immediately prior to retirement full licensure in good standing in any jurisdiction in the United States that licenses persons to practice nursing; or

The applicant has practiced for at least ten (10) years immediately prior to retirement in good standing as a nurse in one (1) or more of the branches of the United States armed services; and

A notarized statement from the applicant, on a form prescribed by the board, that the applicant:

Will not accept any form of remuneration for any nursing services rendered while in possession of a volunteer’s license;

Will devote his nursing practice exclusively and totally to providing nursing services to low income uninsured persons at a nonprofit health care facility in this state; and

Will provide any other documentation that the board reasonably may require.

The holder of a volunteer’s license may provide nursing services only on the premises of a nonprofit health care facility in this state and only to low income uninsured persons. The holder shall not accept any form of remuneration for providing nursing services while in possession of the license. The board may revoke a volunteer’s license on receiving proof satisfactory to the board that the holder has engaged in practice in this state outside the scope of the license.

A volunteer’s license shall be valid for a period of one (1) year, unless earlier revoked under subsection (e) of this section or pursuant to title 33, chapter 21 of the Wyoming statutes. A volunteer’s license may be renewed upon the application of the holder. The board shall maintain a register of all persons who hold volunteer’s licenses. The board shall not charge a fee for issuing or renewing a license pursuant to this section.

To be eligible for renewal of a volunteer’s license, the holder of the license shall certify to the board completion of any continuing education required under this act as if the holder of the license were in active practice. The board shall not renew a license if the holder has not complied with the continuing education requirements. The nonprofit health care facility in which the holder provides nursing services may pay for or reimburse the holder for any costs incurred in obtaining the required continuing education.

The board shall issue to each person who qualifies under this section a volunteer’s license that states the license holder is authorized to provide nursing services pursuant to the laws of this state.

Except as provided in this section, any person holding a volunteer’s license issued by the board under this section shall be subject to the requirements of this act and the jurisdiction of the board as if he were licensed to practice nursing under this act.

The board shall adopt rules to administer and enforce this section.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 116, § 1; 2005, ch. 224, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote (b), specifying the professions; rewrote (d)(ii), deleting former (d)(ii)(B), which read: “A copy of the applicant's most recent license equivalent to a license to practice nursing in one (1) or more branches of the United States armed services that the United States government issued”; in (d)(iv)(B), inserted “nursing” preceding “practice” and substituted “nursing” for “medical” preceding “services”; substituted “license” for “certificate” throughout the section; and made stylistic changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of this act, referred to in this section, see § 33-21-120(a)(xiii).